Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 607, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 607. A. The Oklahoma State Athletic Commission shall
promulgate rules necessary to implement processes for issuing
sanctioning permits for professional combative sports events,
amateur mixed martial arts events, and amateur kickboxing events
held or given in this state and for issuing licenses for
participants of sanctioned contests and exhibitions, except those
events and persons specifically exempt by the provisions of the
Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Act.

Req. No. 15609 Page 1

B. All persons or entities who participate in any professional
combative sports event, amateur mixed martial arts event, or amateur
kickboxing event sanctioned by the Commission, including, but not
limited to, professional combative sports practitioners, corner
persons, booking agents, matchmakers, promoters, referees, judges,
timekeepers, vendors, physicians, announcers, clubs, and
corporations associated with a professional combative sports event
or amateur mixed martial arts event sanctioned by the Commission,
shall be required to make application to the Commission for a
license to participate in this state in any professional combative
sports event, amateur mixed martial arts event or amateur kickboxing
event sanctioned by the Commission.
C. An application for a sanctioning permit or a license shall
be on such form and require such information as shall be prescribed
by the Commission.
D. The 1. Except as provided in paragraph 2 of this
subsection, the Commission shall determine reasonable costs and fees
associated with issuing sanctioning permits and licenses. All costs
and fees for sanctioning an event shall be payable by the promoter
making application for a sanctioning permit. Costs and fees for a
license may be paid by the participant making application or by the
promoter of an event sanctioned by the Commission.
2. The Commission shall not charge any costs or fees for
permits or licenses to persons or entities sanctioning or
Req. No. 15609 Page 2

part icipating in a charity event. For the purposes of this
paragraph, "charity event" means any event hosted by a charitable
organization to raise money for a philanthropic purpose.
E. A sanctioning permit shall be in effect upon the date issued
by the Commission and shall expire upon the conclusion of the event,
unless the sanctioning permit is suspended or revoked for just cause
by the Commission. Licenses shall be in effect upon the date issued
by the Commission, and all licenses shall expire June 30 unless the
license is suspended or revoked for just cause by the Commission.
F. Only promoters whose professional combative sports events,
amateur mixed martial arts events and amateur kickboxing events that
have been sanctioned by the Commission are authorized to place a
notice of sanction on printed and promotional materials associated
with the sanctioned event, which shall include but not be limited to
advertising, tickets, programs, posters, souvenirs, wearing apparel,
billboards, marquees and promotional signs inside and outside the
venue where the event is to be held, and broadcasting, including,
but not limited to, radio, television, including cable television,
pay-per-view television, and closed-circuit television and motion
pictures of the event. The notice of sanction shall substantially
state the following:
"Pursuant to the provisions of Section 601 et seq. of Title
3A of the Oklahoma Statutes and the rules of the Oklahoma
State Athletic Commission, THIS EVENT IS SANCTIONED BY THE
Req. No. 15609 Page 3

OKLAHOMA STATE ATHLETIC COMMISSION. Sanctioning Permit No.
_______."
G. All fees and other monies resulting from sanctioning
professional combative sports events, amateur mixed martial arts
events, and amateur kickboxing events and licenses shall be placed
to the credit of the Oklahoma State Athletic Commission Revolving
Fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15609 AQH 12/15/25














Req. No. 15609 Page 4